Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1408DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1408DP (3) 91
je/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 10A.601, subsections 1 and 7, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
1. A full-time employment appeal board is created within
the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing to hear
and decide contested cases under section 70A.28, chapter 8A,
subchapter IV, and chapters 20, 80, 88, 91C, 96, and 97B. In
addition, the employment appeal board has those powers and
responsibilities assigned to it by chapter 20.
7. An application for rehearing before the appeal board
shall be filed pursuant to section 17A.16, unless otherwise
provided in section 70A.28, chapter 8A, subchapter IV,
or chapter 20, 80, 88, 91C, 96, or 97B. A petition for
judicial review of a decision of the appeal board shall be
filed pursuant to section 17A.19. The appeal board may be
represented in any such judicial review by an attorney who
is a regular salaried employee of the appeal board or who
has been designated by the appeal board for that purpose,
or at the appeal board’s request, by the attorney general.
Notwithstanding the petitioner’s residency requirement in
section 17A.19, subsection 2, a petition for judicial review
may be filed in the district court of the county in which the
petitioner was last employed or resides, provided that if the
petitioner does not reside in this state, the action shall be
brought in the district court of Polk county, Iowa, and any
other party to the proceeding before the appeal board shall
be named in the petition. Notwithstanding the thirty-day
requirement in section 17A.19, subsection 6, the appeal board
shall, within sixty days after filing of the petition for
judicial review or within a longer period of time allowed by
the court, transmit to the reviewing court the original or a
certified copy of the entire records of a contested case. The
appeal board may also certify to the court, questions of law
involved in any decision by the appeal board. Petitions for
judicial review and the questions so certified shall be given
precedence over all other civil cases except cases arising
LSB 1408DP (3) 91
-1- je/js 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
under the workers’ compensation law of this state. No bond
shall be required for entering an appeal from any final order,
judgment, or decree of the district court to the supreme court.
Sec. 2. Section 17A.19, subsection 4, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
The petition for review shall name the agency as respondent
and, except as provided in sections 10A.324 and 20.34. All
petitions for review shall contain a concise statement of:
Sec. 3. Section 96.18, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
96.18 Nonliability of state.
Benefits shall be deemed to be due and payable under this
chapter only to the extent provided in this chapter and to the
extent that moneys are available therefor to the credit of the
unemployment compensation fund, and neither the. The state;
nor the department; the department of inspections, appeals, and
licensing; and the employment appeal board shall not be liable
for any amount in excess of such sums.